New York, session 2025-2026, S4030.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 19-0330 to read as follows: 3 § 19-0330. Air quality standards for toxic air contaminants. 4 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 6 a. "Adjacent to" shall mean within a radius of one mile. 7 b. "Disadvantaged community" shall have the same meaning as in subdi- 8 vision five of section 75-0101 of this chapter. 9 c. "Fenceline" shall mean the property boundary of a major source. 10 d. "Major source" shall mean stationary air contamination source that 11 emits or has the potential to emit ten tons per year or more of a toxic 12 air contaminant or twenty-five tons per year or more of a combination of 13 toxic contaminants. 14 e. "Toxic air contaminant" shall mean benzene, formaldehyde, vinyl 15 chloride, polychlorinated dibenzodioxins, polychlorinated dibenzofurans, 16 trichloroethylene, mercury and any other substances added by the depart- 17 ment. 18 2. Promulgation of standards. a. The department shall, on or before 19 December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-eight, promulgate ambient air 20 quality standards for the following toxic air contaminants: benzene, 21 formaldehyde, vinyl chloride, polychlorinated dibenzodioxins, polychlo- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07000-02-6 S. 4030--A 2 1 rinated dibenzofurans, trichloroethylene and mercury. Such standards may 2 be hourly, rolling eight-hour or annual, or any combination thereof, as 3 determined by the department in consultation with the department of 4 health. 5 b. The ambient air quality standards for toxic air contaminants shall 6 be based on the best available scientific data concerning the potential 7 adverse human health effects of each contaminant. 8 3. Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-nine, the department 9 shall incorporate toxic air contaminants into each major source permit. 10 4. No later than December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-eight, the 11 department shall establish regulations specifying when and how fenceline 12 monitoring will be required for toxic air contaminants by major sources. 13 Such regulations shall at a minimum take into consideration the existing 14 air quality and the major source's proximity to a location within or 15 adjacent to a disadvantaged community. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law.